Florida, session 2026, HB637.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 604.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb637-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 637 2026
604.40 Farm equipment; protection against defective farm
equipment.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Consumer" means a purchaser or lessee of farm
equipment, other than for purposes of resale, or a person
entitled to enforce the obligations of the warranty during the
duration of the farm equipment warranty period.
(b) "Farm equipment" means all power-drawn, power-driven,
or self-propelled equipment primarily designed for use on a farm
or primarily designed to transport farm products.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law, ordinance, rule, or
policy to the contrary, farm equipment all power-drawn, power-
driven, or self-propelled equipment used on a farm or used to
transport farm products may be stored, maintained, or repaired
by the owner within the boundaries of the owner's farm and at
least 50 feet away from any public road without limitation.
(2) This subsection section does not apply to farm
equipment that is used in urban agriculture, as defined in s.
604.73(3).
(3)(a) If farm equipment is defective and does not conform
to all applicable express written warranties, the consumer may
report the defect in writing to the manufacturer or its
authorized service agent during the manufacturer's warranty
period or during the 1-year period following the original
delivery date of the farm equipment to the consumer to allow the
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb637-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 637 2026
manufacturer or its authorized agent the opportunity to conform
the farm equipment to the warranty. Upon receipt of such report,
the manufacturer or its authorized agent shall make such repairs
as are necessary to conform the equipment to the warranty. Such
repairs shall be at no cost to the consumer.
(b) The manufacturer or its authorized agent shall replace
the farm equipment with comparable farm equipment, or accept the
return of the defective farm equipment from the consumer and
refund the consumer and the lienholder or holder of a security
interest, if any, the cash purchase price, including sales tax,
license fees, registration fees, and any similar governmental
charges less a reasonable offset for prior use and depreciation
of the farm equipment, if the manufacturer or its authorized
dealer is not able to or otherwise fails to conform the farm
equipment to any applicable express written warranty after a
reasonable number of attempts.
(c) It is presumed that the manufacturer has made a
reasonable number of attempts to conform the farm equipment to
the applicable express warranties if the same nonconformity has
been the subject of repair three or more times by the
manufacturer or its authorized agent but the nonconformity
continues to exist. All reasonable attempts to conform the farm
equipment to the manufacturer's warranty must be made within 18
months after the consumer reports the defect to the manufacturer
in accordance with paragraph (a).
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb637-02-c2

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/CS/HB 637 2026
(d) In no event shall the presumption provided in
paragraph (c) apply to a manufacturer unless the manufacturer or
its authorized agent has received prior direct written
notification from or on behalf of the consumer and been offered
an opportunity to cure the alleged defect.
(e) The allowable repair period shall be extended by any
period of time during which repair services are not available to
the consumer because of war, invasion, strike, fire, flood, or
natural disaster.
(f) It is an affirmative defense to any claim under this
subsection that:
1. An alleged nonconformity does not substantially impair
the farm equipment's use and market value; or
2. A nonconformity is the result of abuse or neglect, or
of modifications to or alterations of the farm equipment not
authorized by the manufacturer.
(g) Any consumer who suffers a loss by reason of a
violation of this subsection may bring a civil action to enforce
such provision.
(h) This subsection applies to farm equipment sold on or
after July 1, 2026.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb637-02-c2